Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ACCEPTANCE OF DEFERRED RESIGNATION IS NOT A QUIT.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 268.095, or any other law to the contrary, an applicant whose employer offered the applicant a deferred resignation, and who accepted that deferred resignation after January 27, 2025, and before February 13, 2025, is eligible for all unemployment benefits according to Minnesota Statutes, section 268.095, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from January 27, 2025. new text end